District of Columbia statutes.
13-335

Service by publication on domestic or foreign corporations.

In an action specified by section 13-336 , when process can not be served upon a domestic or foreign corporation, the corporation may be proceeded against as a nonresident defendant, by notice by publication.

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 514, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1
1981 Ed., § 13-335.
1973 Ed., § 13-335.